New York, session 2025-2026, A1865.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property law is amended by adding a new section 2 226-aa to read as follows: 3 § 226-aa. Installation of appliances or fixtures by tenant. 1. No 4 landlord shall restrict the installation of appliances or fixtures by a 5 residential tenant, so long as the appliances or fixtures are in compli- 6 ance with applicable building codes or other provisions of law and 7 further provided the residential tenant has sought in writing and 8 obtained written consent from the landlord for such installation. The 9 landlord shall respond in writing to a residential tenant's request for 10 such residential tenant to install appliances or fixtures within thirty 11 days of such request. Any denial of a residential tenant's request to 12 install appliances or fixtures shall include the specific reason for 13 such denial. 14 2. Nothing in this section shall require a landlord to alter the 15 unit's utilities or fundamentally alter the nature of the unit for the 16 installation of any appliances or fixtures by the residential tenant. 17 Nothing in this section shall require the landlord to be responsible for 18 the installation of any appliances or fixtures that the residential 19 tenant has sought and obtained written consent from the landlord to 20 install. 21 3. The imposition of any surcharge for the installation or use of a 22 residential tenant-installed appliance or fixture is prohibited where EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04693-06-6 A. 1865--B 2 1 the residential tenant pays for the applicable utility service directly 2 to the provider. 3 4.(a) At the termination of residential tenancy, the residential 4 tenant shall be responsible for either (i) restoring the installed 5 appliances or fixtures of the unit to the condition which existed prior 6 to the installation or (ii) ensuring the residential tenant-installed 7 appliances or fixtures remain in the unit at no cost to the landlord. 8 (b) Such residential tenant shall notify the landlord in writing of 9 the residential tenant's plan for the storage of the original appliance 10 or fixture for the duration of their tenancy. A landlord may instead opt 11 to store the removed appliance or fixture themselves, at no cost to the 12 residential tenant. 13 5. For the purposes of this section, "appliances or fixtures" shall 14 mean any refrigerator, freezer, range including any cooktop or oven, 15 built-in microwave oven, sink, faucet, or showerhead. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.